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DTC C 1251 / 51 HydraulicBrakeBoosterPumpMotor
Malfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1251/51

Eitherof the following ( 1)or (2) isdetected:
(1)After turning the ignitionswitchON, thecurrentofmore

than30Aflows to themotor formore than 1 sec.
(2) After turning the ignition switch ON, less than 7A

change in current is detected more than 3 times in a low
when the motor is ON.

SHydraulicbrakeboosterpumpmotor

Fail safe function:
If trouble occurs in the pump motor, the ECU cuts off current to the ABS solenoid relay and prohibits ABS
control.
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WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checkoperationofhydraulicbrakeboosterpumpmotor.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the 2 connectors from the hydraulic brake booster.
CHECK:
Connectbatterypositive lead toBM 1 orBM2terminaland
batterynegative lead toEM 1 orEM2terminalof thehydraulic
brake booster (pump motor) connector.
OK:

The operation sound of the pump motor should be
heard.

OK Go to step 4.

NG

2 Check continuity between GND terminal of hydraulic brake booster (pump mo-
tor) connector and body ground.

CHECK:
CheckcontinuitybetweeneachofEM 1 andEM2terminalsof
hydraulic brake booster (pump motor) connector and body
ground.
OK:

Continuity

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
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3 Check hydraulic brake booster resistance.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the 2 connectors from the hydraulic brake booster.
CHECK:
Connect resistancebetween terminalsMT+andMT −, B M1 and
MTT,BM2andMTT,EM 1 andMT+,EM2andMT+of thehy-
draulic brake booster connector.
OK:

30 − 36 �

NG Repair the hydraulic brake booster.

OK

Replace hydraulic brake booster pump mo-
tor.
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4 Check for open circuit in harness and connector between hydraulic brake boost-
er (pump motor) and ABS ECU (See page IN−24).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

5 Check for open or short circuit in harness and connector between pressure
switch and ABS ECU (See page IN−24).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Check and replace ABS ECU.


